District of Columbia statutes.
9-304

Pennsylvania Avenue Bridge.

The East Washington Heights Traction Railroad Company shall bear the cost of maintenance, construction, and repair of the Pennsylvania Avenue Bridge over the Anacostia River in like manner and under the same conditions as are provided by § 9-303.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 636, ch. 1360
Jan. 14, 1933, 47 Stat. 759, ch. 10, § 3
1981 Ed., § 7-504.
1973 Ed., § 7-504.